Utah statutes.
63C-6-102.   Meetings -- Duties -- Committees.
(1)  The commission shall meet at the call of the chair, but not less than
once each quarter.
(2)  The commission shall:
(a)  review earthquake-related hazards and risks to the state of Utah and its
inhabitants;
(b)  prepare recommendations to identify and mitigate these hazards and risks;
(c)  prioritize recommendations and present them to state and local government
or other appropriate entities for adoption as policy or loss reduction
strategies;
(d)  act as a source of information for individuals and groups concerned with
earthquake safety and as a promoter of earthquake loss reduction measures;
(e)  prepare a strategic seismic planning document to be presented to the
State and Local Interim Committee before the 1995 annual general session of
the Legislature; and
(f)  periodically update the planning document and monitor progress toward
achieving the goal of loss reduction.
(3)  The commission may:
(a)  divide into or create subcommittees as it determines necessary to carry
out its duties under this section; and
(b)  accept contributions from other private or public sources and seek grants
or funding from the federal government for uses relating to seismic safety.
